Illinois, session 104th, HB4715.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Police 5Mental Health Leave Act. 6    Section 5. Findings; intent.7    (a) The General Assembly finds that it is in the public 8policy interests of this State for all law enforcement 9personnel working in this State to have some mental health 10days after experiencing a traumatic event while on the job as a 11police officer.12    (b) It is the intent of the General Assembly:13        (1) to establish a minimum paid leave standard for 14    police officers after having experienced a traumatic event 15    in the course of employment; 16        (2) to provide employment security and healthy 17    procedures for police officers who need to use paid time 18    off for their own mental health;19        (3) to safeguard the welfare, health, safety, and 20    prosperity of all police officers sworn by oath to protect 21    the people of this State; and22        (4) to establish a mental health leave program that 23    does not interfere with a workers' compensation claim for   HB4715- 2 -LRB104 20483 SPS 33953 b1    an employee's mental health. 2    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:3    "Employee" means a law enforcement officer as that term is 4defined in the Illinois Police Training Act.5    "Employer" means a law enforcement agency, local law 6enforcement agency, and state law enforcement agency as those 7terms are defined in the Illinois Police Training Act.8    "Mental illness" has the meaning given to that term in 9Section 1-129 of the Mental Health and Developmental 10Disabilities Code.11    "Traumatic event" means an event that occurs within an 12employee's scope of employment that causes the employee 13physical, emotional, or psychological harm, including 14vicarious trauma, and that has the potential to interfere with 15the employee's ability to perform duties effectively. 16"Traumatic event" includes, but is not limited to:17        (1) an officer-involved shooting;18        (2) a serious injury to or death of an employee in the 19    line of duty;20        (3) a serious injury to or death of any person as a 21    result of a police action;22        (4) a multiple casualty incident;23        (5) an in-custody death; and24        (6) a serious injury to or death of a child.   HB4715- 3 -LRB104 20483 SPS 33953 b1    Section 15. Mental health leave requirements.2    (a) An employee suffering from a mental illness as a 3result of a traumatic event shall be entitled to use 5 days of 4paid mental health leave during any 12-month period.5    (b) An employer may require reasonable advanced notice of 6the employee's intention to take leave under subsection (a), 7unless providing notice is not reasonable or practicable.8    (c) An employer shall adopt a mental health leave policy 9that:10        (1) provides clear and objective guidelines 11    establishing the circumstances under which an employee may 12    use mental health leave;13        (2) entitles an employee to use mental health leave 14    without a deduction in salary or other compensation;15        (3) enumerates the number of mental health leave days 16    available to an employee;17        (4) provides for a method by which an employee may 18    confidentially request mental health leave; and19        (5) provides a list of mental health services 20    available to employees in the area of the employer. 21    Section 20. Existing leave policies.22    (a) An employee who is entitled to take paid or unpaid 23leave, including family, medical, sick, annual, personal, or 24similar leave, in accordance with federal, State, or local 25law, a collective bargaining agreement, or an employment   HB4715- 4 -LRB104 20483 SPS 33953 b1benefits program or plan may not be required to substitute any 2period of that leave for an equivalent period of leave 3provided under this Act.4    (b) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to invalidate, 5diminish, or otherwise interfere with any collective 6bargaining agreement, nor shall it be construed to invalidate, 7diminish, or otherwise interfere with any party's power to 8collectively bargain an agreement. The rights afforded under 9this Act serve as the minimum standard in a negotiated 10collective bargaining agreement. 11    Section 25. Employee protections.12    (a) An employee who takes leave under this Act is 13entitled, on return from the leave:14        (1) to be restored by the employer to the position of 15    employment held by the employee when the leave commenced; 16    or17        (2) to be restored to an equivalent position with 18    equivalent employment benefits, pay, and other terms and 19    conditions of employment.20    (b) The taking of leave under this Act shall not result in 21the loss of any employment benefit accrued prior to the date on 22which the leave commenced.23    (c) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to entitle any 24restored employee to:25        (1) the accrual of any seniority or employment   HB4715- 5 -LRB104 20483 SPS 33953 b1    benefits during any period of leave; or2        (2) any right, benefit, or position of employment 3    other than any right, benefit, or position to which the 4    employee would have been entitled had the employee not 5    taken the leave. 6    Section 30. Retaliation.7    (a) It is unlawful for any employer to threaten to take or 8to take any adverse action against an employee because the 9employee: 10        (1) exercises rights or attempts to exercise rights 11    under this Act;12        (2) opposes practices which the employee believes to 13    be in violation of this Act; or14        (3) supports the exercise of rights of another under 15    this Act.16    (b) It is unlawful for any employer to consider the use of 17leave under this Act by an employee as a negative factor in any 18employment action that involves evaluating, promoting, 19disciplining, or counting leave under a no-fault attendance 20policy. 21    Section 35. Private right of action.22    (a) A civil action may be brought in the circuit court by 23an employee to enforce this Act. The circuit court may enjoin 24any act or practice that violates or may violate this Act and   HB4715- 6 -LRB104 20483 SPS 33953 b1may order any other equitable relief that is necessary and 2appropriate to redress the violation or to enforce this Act.3    (b) The right of an employee to bring an action under this 4Section terminates upon the passing of 3 years from the final 5date of performing services to the employer or entity. This 6limitations period is tolled if an employer or entity has 7deterred a person's exercise of rights under this Act. 8    Section 40. Recordkeeping. An employer covered by this Act 9shall record the amount of mental health leave taken under 10this Act by an employee and document the days of leave in the 11employee's record in accordance with the Personnel Record 12Review Act.